nb: Spillenivå: Konkurranse; Elite; Ytelse; Profesjonell; Mosjonist; Annet
ko: 플레이 레벨: 경쟁용; 엘리트용; 퍼포먼스용; 프로용; 레크리에이션용; 기타
ru: Уровень игры: Соревновательный; Элитный; Продвинутый; Профессиональный; Любительский; Другое
da: Spilleniveau: Konkurrence; Elite; Ydeevne; Professionel; Fritid; Andet
en: Level of play: Competitive; Elite; Performance; Professional; Recreational; Other
es: Nivel de juego: Competitivo; Élite; Rendimiento; Profesional; Recreativo; Otro
fr: Niveau de jeu: Compétitif; Élite; Performance; Professionnel; Loisir; Autre
cs: Úroveň hry: Soutěžní; Elitní; Výkonnostní; Profesionální; Rekreační; Jiné
vi: Mức độ chơi: Cạnh tranh (Thi đấu); Xuất sắc; Hiệu suất; Chuyên nghiệp; Giải trí; Khác
it: Livello di gioco: Agonistico; Élite; Performance; Professionale; Amatoriale; Altro
tr: Oyun seviyesi: Rekabetçi; Elit; Performans; Profesyonel; Hobi amaçlı; Diğer
el: Επίπεδο παιχνιδιού: Ανταγωνιστικό; Ελίτ; Επιδόσεων; Επαγγελματικό; Ερασιτεχνικό; Άλλο
bg-BG: Ниво на игра: Състезателно; Елитно; Високо ниво; Професионално; Любителско; Друго
fi: Pelin taso: Kilpataso; Eliittitaso; Aktiivitaso; Ammattilaistaso; Harrastetaso; Muu
zh-TW: 適用等級: 競賽級; 菁英級; 效能級; 職業級; 休閒級; 其他
hu: Játékszint: Versenyszintű; Elit; Teljesítmény; Professzionális; Szabadidős; Egyéb
de: Spielniveau: Wettkampf; Elite; Leistung; Professionell; Freizeit; Sonstige
sl-SI: Raven igranja: Tekmovalna; Elitna; Zmogljivostna; Profesionalna; Rekreativna; Drugo
sk-SK: Úroveň hry: Súťažná; Elitná; Výkonnostná; Profesionálna; Rekreačná; Iné
ja: プレイのレベル: コンペティティブ; エリート; パフォーマンス; プロフェッショナル; レクリエーショナル; その他
hr-HR: Razina igre: Natjecateljska; Elitna; Napredna; Profesionalna; Rekreativna; Ostalo
pt-BR: Nível de jogo: Competitivo; Elite; Desempenho; Profissional; Recreativo; Outro
pt-PT: Nível de jogo: Competitivo; Elite; Desempenho; Profissional; Recreativo; Outro
zh-CN: 使用水平: 竞技级; 精英级; 表现级; 专业级; 休闲级; 其他
pl: Poziom gry: Dla zaawansowanych; Elitarny; Wydajnościowy (performance); Profesjonalny; Rekreacyjny; Inne
th: ระดับการเล่น: แข่งขัน; ชั้นนำ; ประสิทธิภาพ; มืออาชีพ; สันทนาการ; อื่นๆ
sv: Spelnivå: Tävling; Elit; Prestanda; Professionell; Fritid; Övrigt
nl: Speelniveau: Competitief; Elite; Prestatie; Professioneel; Recreatief; Overig
lt-LT: Žaidimo lygis: Varžybinis; Elitinis; Aukšto lygio; Profesionalus; Mėgėjiškas; Kita
ro-RO: Nivelul de joc: Competitiv; De elită; De performanță; Profesionist; De agrement; Altele